North Carolina, session 2025, HB65.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-79.4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority. – Issuable to a registered owner of a motor
vehicle. The plate shall bear the sorority's symbol and name and the phrase
"Greater Service, Greater Progress".
…."
SECTION 2. The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-79.4(b) to ensure that all the special
registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and numbered accordingly.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H65-v-1*